Maryland, session 2025, SB0184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
6–407.
(a) A charitable organization that collects less than $25,000 in charitable
contributions from the public in a year need not pay an annual fee, except that, if the
charitable organization uses a professional solicitor, it shall pay an annual fee of $50.
– 1 –

Ch. 80 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) Each charitable organization that submits a separate registration
statement and collects at least $25,000 in charitable contributions from the public in a year
shall pay an annual fee based on the charitable contributions collected.
(2) The annual fee shall be:
(i) $50, if charitable contributions from the public are at least
$25,000 but less than $50,001;
(ii) $75, if charitable contributions from the public are at least
$50,001 but less than $75,001;
(iii) $100, if charitable contributions from the public are at least
$75,001 but less than $100,001;
(iv) $200, if charitable contributions from the public are at least
$100,001 but less than $500,001; and
(v) $300, if charitable contributions from the public are at least
$500,001.
(c) (1) [An] A CHARITABLE organization failing to file an annual report
either by the end of the 6–month period after the end of the charitable organization’s fiscal
year or within any period of extension granted shall pay, in addition to the annual fee, $25
for each month or part thereof after the date on which the annual report was due to be filed
or after the period of extension granted for such filing.
(2) The late fee shall be assessed 60 days after:
(i) the end of the 6th month after the end of the fiscal year; or
(ii) the period of extension.
(3) Failure to remit an assessed late fee is a violation of this title.
(4) THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY SUSPEND OR WAIVE LATE FEES
IN ACCORDANCE WITH:
(I) REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS
SECTION; OR
(II) A SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT MADE UNDER § 6–205(B) AND
(C) OF THIS TITLE.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 80
(d) The following revenues shall be distributed to the Charitable Enforcement
Fund under Subtitle 2A of this title, to be used only to support the actions of the Secretary
of State and the Attorney General in carrying out the duties of the Secretary of State and
the Attorney General under this title and Title 6.5 of this article:
(1) $100 of the annual fee paid by each charitable organization under
subsection (b)(2)(v) of this section; and
(2) the late fees collected under subsection (c) of this section.
(E) A LATE FEE ASSESSED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED
A DELINQUENT ACCOUNT OR DEBT REQUIRING REFERRAL TO THE CENTRAL
COLLECTION UNIT FOR COLLECTION PURPOSES UNDER § 3–302 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(F) THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS REGARDING THE
SUSPENSION OR WAIVER OF LATE FEES FOR CHARITABLE ORGANIZATIONS THAT
FAIL TO FILE AN ANNUAL REPORT UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
6–417.
A charitable organization that intends to end soliciting shall submit to the Secretary
of State:
(1) a statement of its intent; and
(2) a final annual report within 6 months after the end of its fiscal year.
6–418.
(A) THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY CANCEL THE REGISTRATION OF A
CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION IF:
(1) THE ORGANIZATION FAILED TO SUBMIT:
(I) A STATEMENT OF INTENT AND FINAL ANNUAL REPORT
UNDER § 6–417 OF THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN 3 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE
STATEMENT OF INTENT AND FINAL ANNUAL REPORT WERE DUE; OR
(II) ANY ANNUAL REPORT OR UPDATES REQUIRED UNDER §
6–408 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR A 3–YEAR PERIOD; AND
(2) THE SECRETARY OF STATE SENDS A NOTICE OF CANCELLATION
TO THE LAST KNOWN ADDRESS AND E–MAIL ADDRESS OF THE ORGANIZATION.
– 3 –

Ch. 80 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION MAY REQUEST THAT THE SECRETARY OF
STATE REINSTATE A REGISTRATION CANCELED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION IF THE ORGANIZATION:
(1) SUBMITS TO THE SECRETARY OF STATE ANY OUTSTANDING OR
MISSING ANNUAL REPORTS, SUPPORTING MATERIALS, AND ANNUAL FEES
REQUIRED UNDER THIS TITLE;
(2) (I) REMITS ALL UNPAID LATE FEES; OR
(II) HAD LATE FEES SUSPENDED OR WAIVED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 6–407(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) IS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION, IF APPLICABLE;
(4) HAS A CURRENT TAX–EXEMPT STATUS UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, IF APPLICABLE; AND
(5) PROVIDES ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE SECRETARY OF
STATE REQUIRES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 4 –